Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.120

Unlawful acts.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to:

(a) Make any untrue or misleading statement of a material fact or to omit to state a material fact in connection with the offer, sale, or lease of any business opportunity in the state; or

(b) Employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud; or

(c) Engage in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person; or

(d) Knowingly file or cause to be filed with the director any document which contains any untrue or misleading information; or

(e) Knowingly violate any rule or order of the director.

(2) A violation of this section is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 154; 1981 c 155 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.